Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2536.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 41-1103, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1103. Compensation; reimbursement of expenditures A. Beginning January 1, 2027, members of the legislature are each entitled to receive an annual salary established that is equal to the annual salary of a county supervisor pursuant to the provisions of section 41-1904 section 11-419, subsection a. B. In addition to the salary provided in subsection A of this section, each member of the legislature shall also be reimbursed for travel and subsistence expenses incurred in attendance upon attending regular sessions or special sessions and for acting in a legislative matter, other than in a regular or special session, upon on prior approval of the presiding officer of either house of the legislature at such rate and in such manner as may be prescribed by law. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 41-1903, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1903. Function; applicability A. Beginning in 2002, The commission shall biennially conduct a review of the rates of pay of elective state officers, of justices and judges of courts of record and of clerks of the superior court. Such review by the commission shall be made for the purpose of determining and providing the pay levels appropriate to the duties and responsibilities of the respective offices and positions subject to such review. The commission may hold public hearings to aid it in its work. B. The commission shall submit to the governor no not later than June 1 a report of the results of each review conducted by the commission of the offices and positions subject to this chapter, together with its recommendations. c. This chapter does not apply to the office of state legislator. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 41-1904, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1904. Recommendations A. The governor shall include, in the budget next transmitted by him the governor to the legislature after the date of the submission of the report and recommendations of the commission, his the governor's own recommendations with respect to the exact rates of pay which he that the governor deems advisable for those offices and positions subject to this chapter. B. All or part, as the case may be, of the recommendations of the governor transmitted to the legislature in the budget relating to salaries shall become effective on the first Monday of January of the next calendar year following the transmittal of his the governor's recommendations in the budget, but only to the extent that between the date of transmittal of such recommendations in the budget and the ninetieth day following the transmittal of his the governor's recommendations: 1. No A statute has not been enacted which that establishes rates of pay other than those proposed by all or part of such recommendations. 2. Neither house of the legislature specifically disapproves all or part of such recommendations. In case of either of a legislative enactment or disapproval by either house, the recommendations are effective only insofar as not altered or disapproved. C. Any part of the recommendations of the governor may, in accordance with express provisions of express recommendations, may be made operative on a date later than the date on which such recommendations otherwise would take effect. D. The recommendations of the commission as to legislative salaries shall be certified by it to the secretary of state and the secretary of state shall submit to the qualified electors at the next regular general election the question, "Shall the recommendations of the commission on salaries for elective state officers concerning legislative salaries be accepted? Yes /__/ No /__/". Such recommendations if approved by the electors shall become effective at the beginning of the next regular legislative session without any other authorizing legislation. E. D. The recommendations of the governor transmitted to the legislature under this chapter shall, upon on their effective date, shall supersede all provisions of law in conflict therewith. The recommendations of the governor which that do take effect shall be published with the laws of the this state. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Conditional enactment This act does not become effective unless the Constitution of Arizona is amended by a vote of the people at the next general election by passage of House Concurrent Resolution ______, fifty-seventh legislature, second regular session, relating to compensation of elective state officers.